Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 9
POLICEMEN'S AND FIREFIGHTERS' PENSION REFORM COMMISSION

31-30-901. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part repealed, p. 943, § 10, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This part 9 was added in 1978. For amendments to this part 9 prior to its repeal in 1996, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For provisions relating to police and firefighters' pension plans, see article 30.5 of this title.